New York, session 2025-2026, A4674.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "criminal court opinion transparency act". 3 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 212 of the judiciary law is amended by 4 adding a new paragraph (gg) to read as follows: 5 (gg) Submit to the legislature and the governor a report on or before 6 the fifteenth day of January, two thousand twenty-seven, including: (1) 7 an evaluation of the feasibility and benefit of publishing suppression 8 rulings rendered by trial-level criminal courts and/or collection of 9 data regarding such rulings; (2) whether the publication of additional 10 decisions and/or collection of data would improve the practice of law; 11 (3) an evaluation of the means by which such publication and/or 12 collection of data may be effectuated to improve transparency and the 13 public understanding of such courts; (4) an assessment of any further 14 resources that would be necessary to support increased publication or 15 data collection; and (5) recommendations regarding legislation and 16 administrative measures that could be taken. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 18 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01339-08-6